Nebraska, session 109, LB177.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 77-3001, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-3001 For purposes of the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Cash device means any mechanical amusement device capable of awarding
(a) cash, (b) anything redeemable for cash, (c) gift cards, credit, or other
instruments which have a value denominated by reference to an amount of
currency, or (d) anything redeemable for anything described in subdivision (c)
of this subdivision;
(2) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(3) Distributor means any person, other than a retail establishment, who
places and who either directly or indirectly controls or manages a mechanical
amusement device within a retail establishment within the State of Nebraska;
(4) Manufacturer means an individual, partnership, corporation, or limited
liability company that manufactures, builds, rebuilds, fabricates, assembles,
produces, programs, designs, or otherwise makes modifications to cash devices
or associated equipment for use or play of cash devices;
(5)(a) Mechanical amusement device means any machine which, upon insertion
of a coin, currency, credit card, or substitute into the machine, operates or
may be operated or used for a game, contest, or amusement of any description,
such as, by way of example, but not by way of limitation, pinball games,
shuffleboard, bowling games, radio-ray rifle games, baseball, football, racing,
boxing games, electronic video games of skill, and coin-operated pool tables.
Mechanical amusement device also includes game and draw lotteries and coin-
operated automatic musical devices.
(b) Mechanical amusement device does not mean vending machines which
dispense tangible personal property, devices located in private homes for
private use, pickle card dispensing devices which are required to be registered
with the department pursuant to section 9-345.03, gaming devices or limited
gaming devices as defined in and operated pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack
Gaming Act, or devices which are mechanically constructed in a manner that
would render their operation illegal under the laws of the State of Nebraska;
(6) Net operating revenue means the dollar amount collected by a
distributor or operator of any cash device computed pursuant to applicable
statutes, rules, and regulations less the total of cash awards paid out to
players by the cash device as described in subdivision (1) of this section;
(7) Operator means any person who operates a place of business in which a
mechanical amusement device owned by him or her is physically located and
available for play;
(8) Person means an individual, partnership, limited liability company,
society, association, joint-stock company, corporation, estate, receiver,
lessee, trustee, assignee, referee, or other person acting in a fiduciary or
representative capacity, whether appointed by a court or otherwise, and any
combination of individuals; and
(9) Whenever in the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act the words
electronic video games of skill, games of skill, or skill-based devices are
used, they refer to mechanical amusement devices which produce an outcome
predominantly caused by skill and not chance.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3002, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3002 (1) Any operator shall be required to procure a biennial an annual
license from the Tax Commissioner permitting him or her to operate mechanical
amusement devices within the State of Nebraska. The Tax Commissioner, upon the
application of any person, may issue a license, except that if the applicant
(a) is not of good character and reputation in the community in which he or she
resides, (b) has been convicted of or has pleaded guilty to a felony under the
laws of the State of Nebraska, of any other state, or of the United States, or
(c) has been convicted of or has pleaded guilty to being the proprietor of a
gambling house, or of any other crime or misdemeanor opposed to decency and
morality, no license shall be issued. If the applicant is a corporation whose
majority stockholders could not obtain a license, then such corporation shall
not be issued a license. If the applicant is an individual, the application
shall include the applicant's social security number. Procuring a license shall
constitute sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal
jurisdiction over such person in any action arising out of the operation of
mechanical amusement devices in this state.
(2)(a) Except for an applicant that holds a liquor license under the
-1-

LB177 LB177
2025 2025
Nebraska Liquor Control Act, an applicant for or person holding a license as an
operator of a cash device shall be subject to a one-time background check at
any time by the department including fingerprinting and a check of his or her
criminal history record information maintained by the Identification Division
of the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol for
the purpose of determining whether the Department of Revenue has a basis to
deny the license application or to suspend, cancel, revoke, or terminate the
person's license. Each applicant for or person holding a license pursuant to
this section shall also submit a personal history report to the department on a
form provided by the department and may be subject to a background
investigation, an inspection of the applicant's or licensee's facilities, or
both prior to the issuance of a license. An applicant or licensee shall pay the
costs associated with the background check along with any required fees as
determined by the department.
(b) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to deny any application for a
license as an operator of a cash device for cause. Cause for denial of a
license application includes instances in which the applicant individually, or
in the case of a business entity, any officer, director, employee, or limited
liability company member of the applicant or licensee other than an employee
whose duties are purely ministerial in nature:
(i) Violated the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations, or
duties imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(ii) Knowingly caused, aided, abetted, or conspired with another to cause
any person to violate any of the provisions of the act or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(iii) Obtained a license or permit under the act by fraud,
misrepresentation, or concealment;
(iv) Has been convicted of, forfeited bond upon a charge of, or pleaded
guilty or nolo contendere to any offense or crime, whether a felony or a
misdemeanor, involving any gambling activity or fraud, theft, willful failure
to make required payments or reports, or filing false reports with a
governmental agency at any level;
(v) Denied the department or its authorized representatives, including
authorized law enforcement agencies, access to any place where activity
required to be licensed under the act is being conducted or failed to produce
for inspection or audit any book, record, document, or item required by law,
rule, or regulation;
(vi) Made a misrepresentation of or failed to disclose a material fact to
the department;
(vii) Failed to prove by clear and convincing evidence such applicant's
qualifications to be licensed in accordance with the act;
(viii) Failed to pay any taxes and additions to taxes, including penalties
and interest required by the act or any other taxes imposed pursuant to the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967; or
(ix) Has been cited for a violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act and
had a liquor license suspended, canceled, or revoked by the Nebraska Liquor
Control Commission for illegal gambling activities on or about the premises
licensed by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or the
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act.
(c) No renewal of a license issued pursuant to this section shall be
issued when the applicant for renewal would not be eligible for a license upon
a first application.
(3) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to suspend or revoke the
license of any operator that is in violation of the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act.
(4) Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax
Commissioner pursuant to subsection (2) of section 9-1312, prior to the
winnings payment of any cash device winnings as defined in section 9-1303, an
operator of a cash device shall check the collection system to determine if the
winner has a debt or an outstanding state tax liability as required by the
Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act. If such operator determines
that the winner is subject to the collection system, the operator shall deduct
the amount of debt and outstanding state tax liability identified in the
collection system from the winnings payment and shall remit the net winnings
payment of cash device winnings, if any, to the winner and the amount deducted
to the Department of Revenue to be credited against such debt or outstanding
state tax liability as provided in section 9-1306.
Sec. 3. Section 77-3003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-3003 (1) Any distributor shall be required to procure a biennial an
annual license from the Tax Commissioner permitting him or her to place and
either directly or indirectly control or manage a mechanical amusement device
within the State of Nebraska. The Tax Commissioner, upon the application of any
person, may issue a license, subject to the same limitations as an operator's
license under section 77-3002. If the applicant is an individual, the
application shall include the applicant's social security number.
(2)(a) Except for an applicant that holds a liquor license under the
Nebraska Liquor Control Act, an applicant for or person holding a license as a
distributor of a cash device shall be subject to a one-time background check at
any time by the department including fingerprinting and a check of his or her
criminal history record information maintained by the Identification Division
of the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol for
-2-

LB177 LB177
2025 2025
the purpose of determining whether the Department of Revenue has a basis to
deny the license application or to suspend, cancel, revoke, or terminate the
person's license. Each applicant for or person holding a license pursuant to
this section shall also submit a personal history report to the department on a
form provided by the department and may be subject to a background
investigation, an inspection of the applicant's or licensee's facilities, or
both prior to issuance of the license. An applicant or licensee shall pay the
costs associated with the background check along with any required fees as
determined by the department.
(b) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to deny any application for a
license as a distributor of a cash device for cause. Cause for denial of a
license application includes instances in which the applicant individually, or
in the case of a business entity, any officer, director, employee, or limited
liability company member of the applicant or licensee other than an employee
whose duties are purely ministerial in nature:
(i) Violated the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations, or
duties imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(ii) Knowingly caused, aided, abetted, or conspired with another to cause
any person to violate any of the provisions of the act or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(iii) Obtained a license or permit under the act by fraud,
misrepresentation, or concealment;
(iv) Has been convicted of, forfeited bond upon a charge of, or pleaded
guilty or nolo contendere to any offense or crime, whether a felony or a
misdemeanor, involving any gambling activity or fraud, theft, willful failure
to make required payments or reports, or filing false reports with a
governmental agency at any level;
(v) Denied the department or its authorized representatives, including
authorized law enforcement agencies, access to any place where activity
required to be licensed under the act is being conducted or failed to produce
for inspection or audit any book, record, document, or item required by law,
rule, or regulation;
(vi) Made a misrepresentation of or failed to disclose a material fact to
the department;
(vii) Failed to prove by clear and convincing evidence such applicant's
qualifications to be licensed in accordance with the act;
(viii) Failed to pay any taxes and additions to taxes, including penalties
and interest required by the act or any other taxes imposed pursuant to the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967; or
(ix) Has been cited for a violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act and
had a liquor license suspended, canceled, or revoked by the Nebraska Liquor
Control Commission for illegal gambling activities on or about the premises
licensed by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or the
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act.
(c) No renewal of a license issued pursuant to this section shall be
issued when the applicant for renewal would not be eligible for a license upon
a first application.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2025, the biennial annual license for a
distributor of a cash device shall be accompanied by a fee of two one hundred
dollars per cash device up to a maximum of ten five thousand dollars.
(4) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to suspend or revoke the
license of any distributor that is in violation of the Mechanical Amusement
Device Tax Act.
(5) Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax
Commissioner pursuant to subsection (2) of section 9-1312, prior to the
winnings payment of any cash device winnings as defined in section 9-1303, a
distributor of a cash device shall check the collection system to determine if
the winner has a debt or an outstanding state tax liability as required by the
Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act. If such distributor
determines that the winner is subject to the collection system, the distributor
shall deduct the amount of debt and outstanding state tax liability identified
in the collection system from the winnings payment and shall remit the net
winnings payment of cash device winnings, if any, to the winner and the amount
deducted to the Department of Revenue to be credited against such debt or
outstanding state tax liability as provided in section 9-1306.
Sec. 4. Section 77-3003.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-3003.03 (1) A manufacturer of a cash device shall be required to
procure a biennial an annual license from the Tax Commissioner permitting such
manufacturer to place any cash devices in the State of Nebraska for sale,
lease, or distribution through a third party. The Tax Commissioner, upon the
application of any person, may issue a license subject to the same limitations
as an operator's license under section 77-3002. If the applicant is an
individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security
number. The license fee for a manufacturer of a cash device shall be ten five
thousand dollars.
(2)(a) Each applicant for or person holding a license as a manufacturer of
a cash device shall be subject to a one-time background check at any time by
the department including fingerprinting and a check of his or her criminal
history record information maintained by the Identification Division of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol for the
purpose of determining whether the Department of Revenue has a basis to deny
-3-

LB177 LB177
2025 2025
the license application or to suspend, cancel, revoke, or terminate the
person's license. Each applicant for or person holding a license pursuant to
this section shall also submit a personal history report to the department on a
form provided by the department and may be subject to a background
investigation, an inspection of the applicant's or licensee's facilities, or
both prior to the issuance of a license. An applicant or licensee shall pay the
costs associated with the background check and any required fees as determined
by the department.
(b) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to deny a license for a
manufacturer of a cash device for cause. Cause for denial of a license
application includes instances in which the applicant individually, or in the
case of a business entity, any officer, director, employee, or limited
liability company member of the applicant or licensee other than an employee
whose duties are purely ministerial in nature:
(i) Violated the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations, or
duties imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(ii) Knowingly caused, aided, abetted, or conspired with another to cause
any person to violate any of the provisions of the act or any rules or
regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(iii) Obtained a license or permit under the act by fraud,
misrepresentation, or concealment;
(iv) Has been convicted of, forfeited bond upon a charge of, or pleaded
guilty or nolo contendere to any offense or crime, whether a felony or a
misdemeanor, involving any gambling activity or fraud, theft, willful failure
to make required payments or reports, or filing false reports with a
governmental agency at any level;
(v) Denied the department or its authorized representatives, including
authorized law enforcement agencies, access to any place where activity
required to be licensed under the act is being conducted or failed to produce
for inspection or audit any book, record, document, or item required by law,
rule, or regulation;
(vi) Made a misrepresentation of or failed to disclose a material fact to
the department;
(vii) Failed to prove by clear and convincing evidence such applicant's
qualifications to be licensed in accordance with the act;
(viii) Failed to pay any taxes and additions to taxes, including penalties
and interest required by the act or any other taxes imposed pursuant to the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967; or
(ix) Has been cited for a violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act and
had a liquor license suspended, canceled, or revoked by the Nebraska Liquor
Control Commission for illegal gambling activities on or about the premises
licensed by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or the
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act.
(c) No renewal of a license pursuant to this section shall be issued when
the applicant for renewal would not be eligible for a license upon a first
application.
(3) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to suspend or revoke the
license of any manufacturer of a cash device that is in violation of the
Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act.
Sec. 5. Original sections 77-3001, 77-3002, 77-3003, and 77-3003.03,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-